Tennessee, session 114, HB0082.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 3-6-305(a)(2), is amended by adding
the following new sentence at the end of the subdivision:
An indirect gift includes a gift provided by an entity that is related to, and its business or
political activities intertwined with, the employer of a lobbyist.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-50-502(5), is amended by
redesignating the subdivision as subdivision (5)(A) and adding the following new subdivision
(5)(B):
(B) By the governor or an officer of the governor's cabinet, the amount and
source, by name, of any travel expenses, including any expenses incidental to such
travel, paid on behalf of the governor or officer by a person with an interest in a public
policy of this state if the travel was for the purpose of informing or advising the governor
or officer with respect to the public policy. Travel expenses do not include expenses for
travel, if such expenses are paid for or reimbursed by a governmental entity or an
established and recognized organization of elected or appointed state government
officials, staff of state government officials, or both officials and staff, or any other
established and recognized organization that is an umbrella organization for such
officials, staff, or both officials and staff;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0082
001199
- 1 -